Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,140
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Lindsay Ann Burke Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Dating partner
means any person, regardless of gender, involved in an intimate relationship
with another person primarily characterized by the expectation of affectionate
involvement whether casual, serious, or long-term;

(2) Dating violence means
a pattern of behavior where one person uses threats of, or actually uses,
physical, sexual, verbal, or emotional abuse, to control his or her dating
partner;

(3) Department means the State Department of Education; and

(4) School district
has the same meaning as in section 79-101.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 45.